Utah statutes.
36-11-306.   Conflicts of interest.
(1)  As used in this section, "conflict of interest" means a circumstance
where:
(a)  the representation of one principal or client will be directly adverse to
another principal or client; or
(b)  there is a significant risk that the representation of one or more
principals or clients will be materially limited by the lobbyist's
responsibilities to:
(i)  another principal or client; or
(ii)  a personal interest of the lobbyist.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a lobbyist may not represent a
principal or client if the representation involves a conflict of interest.
(3)  Notwithstanding the existence of a conflict of interest, a lobbyist may
represent a principal or client if:
(a)  the lobbyist reasonably believes that the lobbyist will be able to
provide competent and diligent representation to each principal or client;
(b)  the representation is not otherwise prohibited by law;
(c)  the representation does not require the lobbyist to assert a position on
behalf of one principal or client that is opposed to the position of another
principal or client represented by the lobbyist involving the same legislative
issue; and
(d)  each affected principal or client gives informed consent to the conflict
of interest in writing.
